Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB72.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE V-CTENANTS' RIGHTS IN CASES OF VIOLENCESection 501-C. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Attesting third party." A law enforcement official, 123456789101112131415161718 licensed health care professional, licensed social worker, victim advocate or victim service provider. HUMAN SERVICES PROVIDER AS DEFINED UNDER 37 PA. CODE § 411.2 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS)."CRIME." AN ACT OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, SEXUAL VIOLENCE OR STALKING OR A CRIME AS DEFINED UNDER SECTION 103 OF THE CRIME VICTIMS ACT."Domestic violence." The occurrence of any of the following acts between family or household members as that phrase is defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a) (relating to definitions): (1) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing, or attempting to cause, bodily injury, serious bodily injury or sexual assault.(2) Placing another individual in reasonable fear of imminent serious bodily harm.(3) An act of domestic and other violence as defined in 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3 (relating to definitions). (4) The infliction of false imprisonment under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2903 (relating to false imprisonment)."Domestic violence counselor/advocate." As defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a)."Eligible tenant." Any of the following:(1) A tenant who is a victim.(2) A TENANT WHO HAS A HOUSEHOLD MEMBER WHO IS A VICTIM.(2) (3) A tenant who has an immediate family or household member who is a victim and one of the following apply:(i) the victim resides in the same dwelling unit as the tenant;(ii) (I) the victim resided within 1,000 feet of the 20250HB0072PN3175 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tenant's dwelling unit at the time of the applicable act or crime;(iii) (II) the applicable act or crime was committed in the tenant's dwelling unit or within 1,000 feet of the tenant's dwelling unit; OR (iv) the immediate family or household member of the tenant is a victim of stalking; or(v) the immediate family or household member of the tenant is a victim who was killed in the applicable act or crime.(III) THE VICTIM WAS MURDERED AS A RESULT OF THE APPLICABLE ACT OR CRIME THAT TOOK PLACE WITHIN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE TENANT'S DWELLING UNIT IS LOCATED OR WITHIN 25 MILES OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE TENANT'S DWELLING UNIT IS LOCATED."HOUSEHOLD MEMBER." THE TENANT'S MINOR CHILD OR DEPENDENT OR AN INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED IN WRITING BY THE LANDLORD TO RESIDE IN THE DWELLING UNIT. WRITTEN AUTHORIZATION MUST BE PROVIDED IN ONE OF THE FOLLOWING FORMATS:(1) CERTIFIED MAIL;(2) PRIORITY MAIL THROUGH THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE;(3) ELECTRONIC MAIL;(4) A FORM OF ELECTRONIC OR DIGITAL COMMUNICATION USED BY THE LANDLORD; OR(5) ANY OTHER FORM OF WRITTEN COMMUNICATION SPECIFIED IN THE LEASE."Immediate family or household member." Any of the following:(1) A child or legal ward DEPENDENT of the tenant, 20250HB0072PN3175 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whether of a biological, foster, adoptive or step relationship and regardless of age.(2) A parent, stepparent or legal guardian of a tenant or of a tenant's spouse or domestic partner or an individual who stood in loco parentis to the tenant when the tenant was a minor child.(3) An individual to whom the tenant is legally married or the domestic partner under the laws of any state or political subdivision . (4) A sibling, grandparent or grandchild, whether of a biological, foster, adoptive or step relationship of the tenant or the tenant's spouse or domestic partner.(5) An individual who resides in the same dwelling unit as a tenant."MURDER." AN ACT OR CONDUCT THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE AN OFFENSE UNDER 18 PA.C.S. § 2502 (RELATING TO MURDER)."Rape crisis center." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 5945.1(a) (relating to confidential communications with sexual assault counselors)."Responsible party." An individual who commits, or is alleged to have committed, an act of which a tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim."Sexual violence." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 62A03 (relating to definitions)."Stalking." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2709.1 (relating to stalking)."Tenant." An individual who is a party to a written lease of a dwelling unit and is entitled to possession of the dwelling unit.20250HB0072PN3175 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Victim." Any of the following:(1) An individual against whom an act of CONSTITUTING domestic violence, sexual violence or stalking was committed or attempted, regardless of whether a responsible party was arrested or adjudicated for the commission ARRESTED, CHARGED OR CONVICTED of a crime. (2) An individual against whom a crime as defined in section 103 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, was committed or attempted, regardless of whether an alleged responsible party was arrested or adjudicated ARRESTED, CHARGED OR CONVICTED for the commission of the crime, if the crime or attempt : (i) directly resulted in the individual's physical injury or death; or(ii) included the responsible party exhibiting, drawing, brandishing or using a firearm or other deadly weapon or instrument and directly resulted in the mental injury of the individual against whom the crime was committed.(3) An individual who is an intervenor as defined in section 103 of the Crime Victims Act in an act or crime described under paragraph (1) or (2).(4) An individual who was physically present at the scene of an act or crime described under paragraph (1) or (2) and witnessed the act or crime and who, as a direct result , suffers physical or mental injury."Victim advocate." An individual, whether paid or serving as a volunteer, who provides services to victims under the auspices or supervision of a victim service provider, DISTRICT ATTORNEY OR court or law enforcement or prosecution agency. 20250HB0072PN3175 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Victim service provider." An agency or organization that provides services to victims. The term includes a rape crisis center or domestic violence counselor/advocate.Section 502-C. Early release or termination of lease. (a) Release authorized.--If a tenant is an eligible tenant and the tenant needs to relocate as a result of an applicable act or crime, the tenant may be released from a lease by providing a notice in accordance with subsection (b).(A) REQUIRED RELEASE.--AN ELIGIBLE TENANT SHALL BE RELEASED FROM A LEASE BY PROVIDING NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C). PROVIDING NOTICE IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) DOES NOT CONSTITUTE A BREACH OF THE LEASE.(b) Required release NOTICE .-- (1) An eligible tenant shall be released from a lease if the tenant provides the landlord with a valid notice under this subsection no later than 120 days from the date of any of the following, whichever is later:(i) The most recent occurrence of an act or crime which makes the tenant an eligible tenant.(ii) A document described under paragraph (2)(ii) (A), (B), (C), (D), (E) or (F) is issued. (iii) The responsible party is released from a prison, jail, juvenile detention facility or any other detention facility or institution.(2) A valid notice from the tenant under paragraph (1) shall include:(i) A SIGNED written notice signed by the tenant of the tenant's intent to be THAT THE TENANT BE released from the lease as of a specific date. The written notice under this subparagraph shall include a statement that 20250HB0072PN3175 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the tenant intends to relocate for the safety or the physical or mental well-being of the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant as a direct result of an act of which the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member is OR WAS a victim.(ii) Unless the landlord states in writing that additional documentation is not necessary, one ONE of the following DOCUMENTS : (A) A copy of a valid court order , OTHER THAN AN EX PARTE ORDER, that restrains the responsible party from contact with the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant. (B) A letter from a licensed medical or mental health provider indicating that the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim. (C) A police report documenting the act of which the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim. (D) Evidence that the responsible party has been charged with or convicted of an act of which the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim. (E) A written certification form developed by the Office of Victim Advocate and signed by the tenant and an attesting third party in accordance with section 503-C.(F) If the tenant's immediate family MEMBER or household member is deceased as a result of a crime 20250HB0072PN3175 - 7 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MURDERED , any of the following: (I) A written verification of death, burial or memorial services from a mortuary , funeral home, burial society, crematorium, religious institution, medical examiner or government agency.(II) A published obituary.(III) A death certificate.(3) VALID NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) MUST BE PROVIDED IN ONE OF THE FOLLOWING FORMATS:(I) CERTIFIED MAIL.(II) PRIORITY MAIL THROUGH THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE.(III) ELECTRONIC MAIL.(IV) ANY OTHER FORM OF WRITTEN COMMUNICATION SPECIFIED IN THE LEASE.(c) Effect of notice.--After a valid notice is provided by a tenant in accordance with subsection (b), the following shall apply:(1) The tenant shall be released from the lease no later than 30 days after the date the notice was provided, or on the date specified in the notice under subsection (b)(2)(i), whichever is later , if AND the tenant vacates SHALL VACATE the dwelling unit on or before the applicable date OF TERMINATION . (2) The tenant shall not be liable for rent , EARLY TERMINATION FEES or other obligations under the lease accruing after the date of the termination.(3) The termination shall not affect the tenant's obligations or outstanding rents or arrears under the lease 20250HB0072PN3175 - 8 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accruing before the date of the termination.(d) Construction.-- Nothing in this section shall be (1) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE construed to relieve a tenant who is not an eligible tenant from the tenant's obligations under a lease. If there are multiple tenants who are parties to a lease, the release of one or more tenants under this section shall not terminate the lease with respect to the other nonterminating tenants. A tenant released from a lease under this section shall not be liable to the landlord or any other person for rent accruing after the tenant's release or for actual damages resulting from the tenant's release from the lease.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A LANDLORD FROM ALLOWING A TENANT TO TERMINATE A LEASE EARLY FOR ANY REASON WITHOUT REQUIRING DOCUMENTATION.(e) Limitation.--A tenant may not seek the termination of or a release from a lease under this section on the basis of an act for which the tenant is the A responsible party. Section 503-C. Certification form requirements. (a) Certification form.--The Office of Victim Advocate shall develop and display on the Office of Victim Advocate's publicly accessible Internet website a certification form with the requirements specified under subsection (b).(b) Required information.-- (1) A tenant shall verify all of the following information in the certification form developed by the Office of Victim Advocate for the purpose of section 502-C(b)(2)(ii) (E) : (i) The tenant's name and the address of the dwelling unit.20250HB0072PN3175 - 9 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The name of the EACH victim if different from the tenant's name.(iii) The name of the responsible party if IT IS known and can be safely disclosed.(iv) The approximate LOCATIONS AND dates and locations during which the act or acts which THAT qualify the tenant as an eligible tenant occurred, including the most recent date.(v) A statement that the tenant intends to relocate for the safety or the physical or mental well-being of the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant as a direct result of an act of which the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member is a victim.(vi) The date on which the tenant intends to vacate the dwelling unit TERMINATE THE LEASE . (2) An attesting third party shall verify all of the following information in the certification form developed by the Office of Victim Advocate for the purpose of section section 502-C(b)(2)(ii)(E) : (i) T he name and business telephone number of the attesting third party.(ii) The capacity in which the attesting third party received the information that the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member was a victim. (iii) A statement that the attesting third party:(A) read the tenant's verification under paragraph (1) and has been advised by the tenant that the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim;20250HB0072PN3175 - 10 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) believes that the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim;(C) believes the tenant is an eligible tenant; (D) believes that the tenant needs to relocate for the safety or the physical or mental well-being of the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant as a direct result of an act of which the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member is a victim; and (E) understands that the verification under this paragraph may be used as the basis for releasing the tenant from a lease.(c) Confidentiality.--Furnishing evidence or providing a verification under this section or section 502-C shall not waive a confidentiality or privilege that may exist between the tenant or victim and a AN ATTESTING third party. Section 504-C. Change of locks. (a) Right of tenants.--Subject to subsections (b) and (c), if a tenant is an eligible tenant and the tenant has a reasonable fear that a responsible party or another individual acting on the responsible party's behalf may attempt to gain access to the TENANT'S dwelling unit that the tenant leases , the tenant may change or rekey the locks or other security devices for the dwelling unit. A tenant who changes or rekeys the locks shall notify the landlord within 48 24 hours and make arrangements to immediately provide a key or other means of access to the landlord or any other tenant, other than the responsible party, who is a party to a lease.(b) Right of landlords.--If the locks or other security 20250HB0072PN3175 - 11 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 devices are changed or rekeyed under subsection (a), the landlord may change or rekey the locks to ensure compatibility with the landlord's master key or other means of access or otherwise accommodate the landlord's reasonable commercial needs.(c) Prohibition.--If a responsible party is a party to a lease, a tenant may not change or rekey the locks or other security devices under subsection (a) unless:(1) there is a court order , other than an ex parte order, expressly requiring the responsible party to vacate the dwelling unit or prohibiting the responsible party from having contact with the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant who is a victim of the responsible party; and(2) the tenant provides a copy of the court order under paragraph (1) to the landlord.(d) Civil relief.--A responsible party shall not be entitled to damages or other civil relief against a landlord or tenant who complies in good faith with this section.Section 505-C. Prohibition on certain acts by landlords.(a) Prohibition.--A landlord may not do any of the following WITH RESPE CT TO THE TENANT, PROVIDED THE TENANT IS NOT THE RESPONSIBLE PARTY : (1) Assess a fee or penalty against a tenant or otherwise retaliate against the tenant solely for exercising a right granted under this article.(2) Consider a tenant for any purpose, due solely to the tenant exercising a right granted under this article, to have breached the terms of the lease.(3) By reason of a tenant exercising a right granted 20250HB0072PN3175 - 12 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this article, withhold return to the tenant of a security deposit or other escrows to which the tenant is otherwise entitled due to the tenant terminating a lease under this article. The provisions of Article V shall otherwise apply with regard to the retention or return of escrow funds and to other sums that may be withheld by the landlord. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect a tenant's liability for unpaid rent or other amounts owed to the landlord before the termination of a lease under this act.(3) REFUSE TO RETURN A TENANT'S SECURITY DEPOSIT SOLELY BECAUSE AN ELIGIBLE TENANT EXERCISED A RIGHT GRANTED UNDER THIS ARTICLE. THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE V SHALL OTHERWISE APPLY WITH REGARD TO THE RETENTION OR RETURN OF ESCROW FUNDS, INCLUDING SECURITY DEPOSITS, AND OTHER SUMS THAT MAY BE WITHHELD BY THE LANDLORD.(4) Increase or threaten to increase the rent, security deposit or fees payable under a lease, decrease or threaten to decrease services required under a lease or this act , terminate or threaten to terminate a lease, refuse to renew a lease, serve or A NOTICE TO QUIT OR OTHERWISE threaten to serve a notice to terminate a periodic tenancy PRIOR TO THE END OF THE TERM , bring or threaten to bring an action for possession , refuse to lease a dwelling unit or impose different rules or selectively enforce the landlord's rules because of any of the following:(i) A tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is or has been a victim.(ii) A tenant or proposed tenant has previously exercised a right granted under this article.20250HB0072PN3175 - 13 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) Criminal activity occurred relating to an act or acts of which a tenant or an immediate family or household member of the tenant is a victim and the tenant is not a responsible party.(iv) (III) Police or emergency personnel responded to a good faith complaint of activities relating to an THE act or acts of which the tenant or an immediate family MEMBER or household member of the tenant is a victim and the tenant is not a responsible party . (5) Disclose CONFIDENTIAL information reported to the landlord in a notice under section 502-C to another party PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE unless any of the following apply: (i) The tenant provides specific time-limited and contemporaneous consent to the disclosure in writing WRITTEN CONSENT . (ii) The information is required to be disclosed by a court order or any other Federal or State law. (III) THE INFORMATION IS PROVIDED IN THE NORMAL COURSE OF BUSINESS TO A LANDLORD'S PROFESSIONAL ADVISORS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, AN ATTORNEY, ACCOUNTANT OR FINANCIAL ADVISOR. IF INFORMATION IS PROVIDED TO A PROFESSIONAL ADVISOR UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH, THE PROFESSIONAL ADVISOR IS PROHIBITED FROM SHARING THE INFORMATION WITH ANY OTHER THIRD PARTY.(B) CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION.--THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENTS AND INFORMATION CONTAINED WITHIN THE DOCUMENTS SHALL BE CONFIDENTIAL AND MAY NOT BE DISCLOSED, EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (A)(5):(1) NOTICE OF THE ELIGIBLE TENANT'S INTENT TO RELOCATE.(2) MEDICAL RECORDS OF THE ELIGIBLE TENANT OR TENANT'S 20250HB0072PN3175 - 14 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 HOUSEHOLD MEMBER OR IMMEDIATE FAMILY MEMBER, INCLUDING LETTERS FROM LICENSED MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH PROVIDERS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 502-C.(3) COURT DOCUMENTS THAT ARE NOT PUBLICLY AVAILABLE.(4) LAW ENFORCEMENT RECORDS.(5) WRITTEN CERTIFICATION FORMS SIGNED BY THE TENANT AND AN ATTESTING THIRD PARTY DESCRIBED IN SECTION 503-C.(6) WRITTEN VERIFICATIONS OF DEATH AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 503-C THAT ARE NOT PUBLICLY AVAILABLE.(b) (C) Willful violation.-- (1) If a landlord willfully violates this section, a tenant may terminate a lease or defend an action for possession on the grounds that the landlord willfully violated this section or obtain appropriate injunctive relief.(2) In the action under paragraph (1), the court shall award the tenant an amount equal to two months' rent, or double actual damages, whichever is greater. Section 2. The addition of Article V-C of the act shall apply to leases entered into or extended on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 180 days.20250HB0072PN3175 - 15 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122